Delaware, session 153, HB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Article I of the Delaware Constitution by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 11. Excessive bail or fines; cruel punishments; prohibition of death penalty; health of prisoners. Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel punishments inflicted; inflicted, nor the death penalty imposed; and in the construction of jails a proper regard shall be had to the health of prisoners.